Connecticut, session 2026, SB00519.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 15 of special act 07-11, as amended by section 4 of
public act 10-1 of the June special session and section 10 of special act
15-1 of the June special session, is amended to read as follows (Effective
from passage):
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of the general statutes, the
Commissioner of Transportation shall convey to the Bridgeport Port
Authority a parcel of land located in the city of Bridgeport, at a cost
equal to the administrative costs of making such conveyance. Said
parcel of land has an area of approximately 1.008 acres and is identified
as a certain parcel of land situated in the city of Bridgeport, county of
Fairfield, and state of Connecticut, being more particularly bounded
and described as follows:
"Beginning at a point, said point being the southeast corner of the
intersection of Seaview Avenue and the eastbound off-ramp of
Interchange 29, Interstate 95;
Thence running southwesterly along land of the Bridgeport Port
Authority, 620', more or less;

Substitute Senate Bill No. 519
Thence running northerly along the easterly highway line of
Stratford Avenue, along a curved line concave to the west, 370' more or
less;
Thence running easterly along the southerly highway line of said
eastbound off-ramp of Interchange 29, Interstate Route 95, 440' more or
less."
The conveyance shall be subject to the approval of the State Properties
Review Board.
(b) (1) The Bridgeport Port Authority shall use said parcel of land for
economic development or waterfront related purposes and may sell or
lease all or any portion of said parcel for economic development or
waterfront related purposes. If the Bridgeport Port Authority:
(A) Does not use said parcel for said purposes; or
(B) Sells or leases all or any portion of said parcel, except for a sale or
lease of all or any portion of said parcel for economic development or
waterfront related purposes, in accordance with the provisions of this
subsection, the parcel shall revert to the state of Connecticut. Any sale
or lease of said parcel in accordance with this section shall be for [the
fair market value of the property or lease of said property, as
determined by the average of the appraisals of two independent
appraisers selected by the commissioner] one hundred nineteen
thousand dollars. Any funds received by the Bridgeport Port Authority
from a sale or lease of said parcel in accordance with this section shall
be transferred to the State Treasurer for deposit in the Special
Transportation Fund.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of the general statutes, the
Department of Transportation shall grant the Bridgeport Port Authority
a right of way from Stratford Avenue, Connecticut Route 130, directly
to and from said parcel, at a place to be determined by the department.
Special Act No. 26-2 2 of 3

Substitute Senate Bill No. 519
(c) The State Properties Review Board shall complete its review of the
conveyance of said parcel of land not later than thirty days after it
receives a proposed agreement from the Department of Transportation.
The land shall remain under the care and control of said department
until a conveyance is made in accordance with the provisions of this
section. The State Treasurer shall execute and deliver any deed or
instrument necessary for a conveyance under this section, which deed
or instrument shall include provisions to carry out the purposes of
subsection (b) of this section. The Commissioner of Transportation shall
have the sole responsibility for all other incidents of such conveyance.
Governor's Action:
Approved May 11, 2026
Special Act No. 26-2 3 of 3